Illinois, session 104th, HB4080.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Judicial security tax credit. 8    (a) As used in this Section: 9    "Eligible member of the judiciary" means a federal judge 10or a judge of the Illinois Supreme Court, Illinois Appellate 11Court, or Illinois Circuit Court. 12    "Federal judge" has the meaning given to that term in the 13Daniel Anderl Judicial Security and Privacy Act of 2022 (P.L. 14117-263, Division E Title LIX, Subtitle D). 15    "Qualified security expense" means any expense incurred by 16an eligible member of the judiciary either (i) to procure the 17services at the taxpayer's residence of a person who is 18licensed under the Private Detective, Private Alarm, Private 19Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004 as a 20private alarm agency or private security contractor agency or 21(ii) to install and maintain at the taxpayer's residence 22security cameras, security lighting, interior or exterior 23locks, panic buttons, safe rooms, alarm systems, or other   HB4080- 2 -LRB104 14359 HLH 27493 b1facility access control or security systems. 2    (b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 32026, a taxpayer who is an eligible member of the judiciary 4shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by 5subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount equal to 6the qualified security expenses incurred by the taxpayer 7during the taxable year. The credit may not be carried back and 8may not reduce the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If 9the amount of the credit exceeds the tax liability for the 10year, the excess may be carried forward and applied to the tax 11liability of the 5 taxable years following the excess credit 12year. The tax credit shall be applied to the earliest year for 13which there is a tax liability. If there are credits for more 14than one year that are available to offset a liability, the 15earlier credit shall be applied first.16    (c) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 17250.  18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.